Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-222
Board; officers; compensation; expenses; records; reports; employees.

The board shall annually elect a president and vice president, and the board shall appoint a director who shall serve as secretary of the board. The board shall be furnished with suitable quarters in the State Capitol or elsewhere. It shall adopt and use a common seal for the authentication of its orders and records. The secretary of the board shall keep a record of all proceedings of the board. A majority of the board, in a meeting duly assembled, may perform and exercise all the duties and powers delegated to the board. Each member of the board shall receive a compensation of one hundred fifty dollars per diem and shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the discharge of such member's duties as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177, not to exceed two thousand dollars per annum. Salaries and expenses shall be paid only from the fund created by fees collected in the administration of the Barber Act, and no other funds or state money except as collected in the administration of the act shall be drawn upon to pay the expense of administration. The board shall report each year to the Governor a full statement of its receipts and expenditures and also a full statement of its work during the year, together with such recommendations as it may deem expedient. The board may employ one field inspector and such other inspectors, clerks, and assistants as it may deem necessary to carry out the act and prescribe their qualifications. No owner, agent, or employee of any barber school shall be eligible for membership on the board.

Laws 1927, c. 163, § 19, p. 435;

Laws 1933, c. 121, § 2, p. 491;

R.S.1943, § 71-222;

Laws 1957, c. 294, § 9, p. 1057;

Laws 1963, c. 409, § 25, p. 1326;

Laws 1971, LB 1020, § 26;

Laws 1972, LB 1183, § 5;

Laws 1978, LB 722, § 16;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 113;

Laws 1993, LB 226, § 8;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 59;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 69.